Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0560.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act to create certain funds; to provide for the allocation of certain revenues among certain funds and for the operation, investment, and expenditure of certain funds; to provide for the creation and administration of certain grant programs; and to impose certain provide for the powers and duties and requirements on of certain state officials.and local governmental officers and entities. Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Community district education trust fund" means the community district education trust fund created in section 12. (b) "Flint settlement trust fund" means the Flint settlement trust fund created in section 11. (c) "Local government reimbursement fund" means the local government reimbursement fund created in section 3a. (d) "Medicaid benefits trust fund" means the Michigan Medicaid benefits trust fund established in section 5. (e) "Medicaid program" means a program for medical assistance established under title XIX of the social security act, 42 USC 1396 to 1396w-6.1396w-8. (f) "Medicaid special financing payments" means the Medicaid special adjustor payments each year authorized in the department of health and human services appropriations act. (g) "Michigan merit award trust fund" means the Michigan merit award trust fund established in section 9. (h) "Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund" means the Michigan opioid healing and recovery fund created in section 3. (i) "Revenue sharing trust fund" means the revenue sharing trust fund established in section 11a. (j) (i) "Strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund" means the strategic outreach and attraction reserve fund created in section 4. (k) (j) "Tobacco settlement revenue" means money received by this state that is attributable to the master settlement agreement incorporated into a consent decree and final judgment entered into on December 7, 1998 in Kelly Ex Rel. Michigan v Philip Morris Incorporated, et al., Ingham County Circuit Court, docket no. 96-84281CZ, including any rights to receive money attributable to the master settlement agreement that has been sold by this state. (l) (k) "21st century jobs trust fund" means the 21st century jobs trust fund established in section 7. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) Senate Bill No. 561. (b) Senate Bill No. 559.